SciBin2/dics/ru_RU.dic
автоматизировать/BbLLNn
адресовать/BbLLNn
аккумулироваться/BbLLNn
акцептироваться/BbLLNn
амортизировать/BbLLNn
анкетироваться/BbLLNn
антрепренёрствовать/BbLLNn
арендоваться/BbLLNn
ассимилироваться/BbLLNn
аффинировать/BbLLNn
бальзамировать/BbLLNn
бездействовать/BbLLNn
бетонироваться/BbLLNn
благотворительствовать/BbLLNn
богатить/BBLLNn
бороздиться/BBLLNn
бродить/BBLLNn
буйствовать/BbLLNn
быковать/BbLLNn
вброситься/BbLLNn
вдаться/BBLLNn
веровать/BbLLNn
взбежать/BbLLNn
взводиться/BBLLNn
взметать/BBBGLLNNNn
визировать/BbLLNn
вколотить/BBLLNn
вмазаться/BbLLNn
военизировать/BbLLNn
воззреть/BGLLNn
возревновать/BbLLNn
воодушевиться/BBLLYYNn
воспринять/BGLLNn
восходить/BBLLNn
врачеваться/BbLLNn
всколотить/BBLLNn
встрепать/BGLLNn
втравиться/BBLLNn
выбесить/BBLLNn
вывеситься/BBLLNn
выгородить/BBLLNn
выжелтиться/BBLLNn
выковать/BbLLNn
выкрутить/BBLLNn
вылупиться/BBLLYYNn
выпахать/BGLLNn
выправиться/BbBGLLNn
выродить/BBLLNn
высказать/BGLLNn
выстудить/BBLLNn
вытопиться/BBLLNn
выхлестать/BbLLNn
вязаться/BGLLNn
гармонировать/BbLLNn
герметизировать/BbLLNn
гипостазировать/BbLLNn
глядеться/BGLLNn
гомозить/BBLLNn
гофрировать/BbLLNn
грезить/BbLLNn
грудиться/BBLLNn
даваться/BBLLNnSFSJSKSNSOSPSQSXSYSbShSkSmSnSoSrStSuSvSwSxSzsAsDsEsFsGsIsMsPsQsUsYTFTJTKTZTaTbTcTdTeTfTgThTiTjTl
деблокировать/BbLLNn
дезертировать/BbLLNn
деквалифицировать/BbLLNn
демаскировать/BbLLNn
демпфировать/BbLLNn
десантировать/BbLLNn
деформироваться/BbLLNn
дивоваться/BbLLNn
дискредитироваться/BbLLNn
дисциплинировать/BbLLNn
довертеться/BGLLNn
догматизировать/BbLLNn
доискаться/BGLLNn
докупить/BBLLNn
донкихотствовать/BbLLNn
дорассказать/BGLLNn
доснять/BGLLNn
доторговаться/BbLLNn
дрематься/BGLLNn
дырявить/BbLLNn
желтить/BBLLNn
заактировать/BbLLNn
забастовать/BbLLNn
заболотиться/BbLLNn
забуксовать/BbLLNn
завинтить/BBLLNn
завязаться/BGLLNn
загнусавить/BbLLNn
загрипповать/BbLLNn
задекламировать/BbLLNn
заелозить/BbLLNn
заимствовать/BbLLNn
заквохтать/BGLLNn
заколобродить/BbLLNn
законтрактоваться/BbLLNn
закривить/BBLLYYNn
закучерявиться/BbLLNn
залупиться/BBLLNn
заметать/BBBGLLNNNn
замуроваться/BbLLNn
занумеровать/BbLLNn
запиздить/BBLLNn
запрессовать/BbLLNn
запульсировать/BbLLNn
зарезервировать/BbLLNn
зарубцеваться/BbLLNn
засидеться/BGLLNn
засмеяться/BGLLNn
застолбить/BBLLYYNn
засыпать/BBBGLLNNNn
затопить/BBLLNn
затребовать/BbLLNn
зафиксировать/BbLLNn
заходить/BBLLNn
зачать/BbLLNn
зашпунтовать/BbLLNn
звездиться/BBLLNn
злословить/BbLLNn
игнорировать/BbLLNn
избичевать/BbLLNn
извороваться/BbLLNn
издырявить/BbLLNn
измаять/BGLLNn
изовраться/BGLLNn
изрубцевать/BbLLNn
иллюминироваться/BbLLNn
импрегнировать/BbLLNn
индустриализовать/BbLLNn
иночествовать/BbLLNn
интенсифицировать/BbLLNn
интонировать/BbLLNn
исколесить/BBLLNn
искропить/BBLLYYNn
испортиться/BBBbLLNn
истолковать/BbLLNn
иступиться/BBLLNn
кадить/BBLLNn
камуфлировать/BbLLNn
каптировать/BbLLNn
катетеризовать/BbLLNn
кинофицировать/BbLLNn
клинкеровать/BbLLNn
коксовать/BbLLNn
колоситься/BBLLNn
комиссоваться/BbLLNn
компостироваться/BbLLNn
кондиционироваться/BbLLNn
констатироваться/BbLLNn
контролироваться/BbLLNn
кооптироваться/BbLLNn
короноваться/BbLLNn
костюмировать/BbLLNn
кремировать/BbLLNn
крутиться/BBLLNn
купить/BBLLNn
лабиализоваться/BbLLNn
лебезить/BBLLNn
лизаться/BGLLNn
лоббировать/BbLLNn
лудить/BBLLNn
мазаться/BbLLNn
мародёрствовать/BbLLNn
машинизироваться/BbLLNn
метить/BbLLNn
миноваться/BbLLNn
мозговать/BbLLNn
морозиться/BbLLNn
мульчировать/BbLLNn
набавить/BbLLNn
набродиться/BBLLNn
навоеваться/BbLLNn
наглядеться/BGLLNn
нагромоздить/BBLLNn
надломить/BBLLNn
наездить/BBLLNn
накаверзить/BBLLNn
накомандоваться/BbLLNn
наладиться/BbLLNn
намазать/BbLLNn
наноситься/BBLLNn
наплутовать/BbLLNn
напробоваться/BbLLNn
нарисовать/BbLLNn
насказать/BGLLNn
насосать/BGLLNn
насурьмить/BBLLYYNn
наторговаться/BbLLNn
наудить/BBLLNn
нацеловаться/BbLLNn
нащепать/BBBGLLNNNn
недоплатить/BBLLNn
низводиться/BBLLNn
обвертеть/BGLLNn
обгородить/BBLLNn
обезумить/BbLLNn
обкрутиться/BBLLNn
обметать/BBBGLLNNNn
обосноваться/BbLLNn
обследоваться/BbLLNn
обыноземиться/BbLLNn
озаглавить/BbLLNn
оконфузить/BbLLNn
онанировать/BbLLNn
оптировать/BbLLNn
оскоромиться/BbLLNn
отбавить/BbLLNn
отвозиться/BBLLNn
откатиться/BBLLNn
отлаять/BGLLNn
относиться/BBLLNn
отпочковаться/BbLLNn
отреставрировать/BbLLNn
оттеребить/BBLLYYNn
отцепить/BBLLNn
охаять/BGLLNn
палатализоваться/BbLLNn
паскудить/BbLLNn
переаранжировать/BbLLNn
перевозбудить/BBLLNn
передислоцироваться/BbLLNn
перекипеть/BGLLNn
перекусить/BBLLNn
перемутиться/BBLLNn
перепортить/BBBbLLNn
пересадить/BBLLNn
перетолковать/BbLLNn
перехлестать/BbLLNn
пилотировать/BbLLNn
поагитировать/BbLLNn
повертеться/BGLLNn
погасить/BBLLNn
подбавить/BbLLNn
подживить/BBLLYYNn
подкоситься/BBLLNn
подносить/BBLLNn
подсмеяться/BGLLNn
подхватить/BBLLNn
позавидовать/BbLLNn
покипеть/BGLLNn
покровительствовать/BbLLNn
политиканствовать/BbLLNn
помесить/BBLLNn
поносить/BBLLNn
поправиться/BbLLNn
порассудить/BBLLNn
посердиться/BBLLNn
посредствовать/BbLLNn
потолковать/BbLLNn
поубавиться/BbLLNn
почковаться/BbLLNn
превозвысить/BbLLNn
презентовать/BbLLNn
прибавить/BbLLNn
пригвоздить/BBLLNn
приколесить/BBLLNn
принарядить/BBLLNn
припросить/BBLLNn
притомить/BBLLYYNn
приштуковать/BbLLNn
пробуравить/BbLLNn
проглотить/BBLLNn
продекларировать/BbLLNn
прозондировать/BbLLNn
прокомандовать/BbLLNn
пролетаризироваться/BbLLNn
проносить/BBLLNn
прореферировать/BbLLNn
прослезить/BBLLNn
протезировать/BbLLNn
протушевать/BbLLNn
прошипеть/BGLLNn
пьянствовать/BbLLNn
развередить/BBLLNn
разграбить/BbLLNn
разлакомиться/BbBGLLNn
разморозиться/BbLLNn
разрезать/BBBbLLNNNn
расковаться/BbLLNn
распасовать/BbLLNn
рассеять/BGLLNn
рассудиться/BBLLNn
расфокусироваться/BbLLNn
расщепать/BBBGLLNNNn
регламентироваться/BbLLNn
реконструироваться/BbLLNn
реставрироваться/BbLLNn
рифмовать/BbLLNn
рябить/BBLLNn
сбежаться/BbLLNn
свидетельствоваться/BbLLNn
сготовить/BbLLNn
сердиться/BBLLNn
сказать/BGLLNn
сколотиться/BBLLNn
скоромить/BbLLNn
слепиться/BBLLNn
сморозить/BbLLNn
советоваться/BbLLNn
сопеть/BGLLNn
социализировать/BbLLNn
спохватиться/BBLLNn
срезаться/BBBbLLNNNn
стасовать/BbLLNn
сторцевать/BbLLNn
субсидироваться/BbLLNn
сфальцевать/BbLLNn
съездить/BBLLNn
телефонировать/BbLLNn
томиться/BBLLNn
тракторизоваться/BbLLNn
трестировать/BbLLNn
уверовать/BbLLNn
удивиться/BBLLYYNn
уладить/BbLLNn
уплыть/LLBgNn
ускакать/BGLLNn
утомиться/BBLLYYNn
уязвить/BBLLYYNn
философствовать/BbLLNn
форсить/BBLLNn
хвостаться/BbLLNn
христианизироваться/BbLLNn
цокотать/BGLLNn
шаховать/BbLLNn
шпиговать/BbLLNn
щекотаться/BGLLNn
экспроприировать/BbLLNn
юстироваться/BbLLNn
